Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 2
APPROPRIATION OF WATER — PERMITS, CERTIFICATES, AND LICENSES — SURVEY

Sec.

§ 42-201. Water rights acquired under chapter — Illegal diversion and application of water — Uses for which water right not required — Exclusive authority of department.

All rights to divert and use the waters of this state for beneficial purposes shall hereafter be acquired and confirmed under the provisions of this chapter and not otherwise. And after the passage of this title, all the waters of this state shall be controlled and administered in the manner herein provided. Such appropriation shall be perfected only by means of the application, permit and license procedure as provided in this title; provided, however, that in the event an appropriation has been commenced by diversion and application to beneficial use prior to the effective date of this act, it may be perfected under such method of appropriation.

No person shall use the public waters of the state of Idaho except in accordance with the laws of the state of Idaho. No person shall divert any water from a natural watercourse or apply water to land without having obtained a valid water right to do so, or apply it to purposes for which no valid water right exists.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section or section 42-229, Idaho Code, water may be diverted and used at any time, with or without a water right:

To extinguish an existing fire on private or public lands, structures, or equipment, or to prevent an existing fire from spreading to private or public lands, structures, or equipment endangered by an existing fire;

For forest practices as defined in section 38-1303(1), Idaho Code, and forest dust abatement. Such forest practices and forest dust abatement use is limited to two-tenths (0.2) acre-feet per day from a single watercourse; or

For the immediate cleanup or removal of hazardous substances or petroleum, as defined in section 39-7203, Idaho Code, that is part of an emergency response by a state emergency response team or local emergency response authority to a release, as defined in section 39-7103, Idaho Code, to protect public health or the environment. The Idaho department of environmental quality, in coordination with the Idaho office of emergency management, shall report to the Idaho department of water resources within seventy-two (72) hours the location, need, and expected duration of the emergency response and shall consult the director of the Idaho department of water resources on maintaining delivery of existing water rights during cleanup or removal operations.

For purposes of subsection (3)(b) of this section, no person shall divert water from a canal or other irrigation facility while the water is lawfully diverted, captured, conveyed, used or otherwise physically controlled by the appropriator.

If water is to be diverted from a natural watercourse within a water district, or from a natural watercourse from which an irrigation delivery entity diverts water, a person diverting water pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section shall give notice to the watermaster of the intent to divert water for the purposes set forth in said subsection. In the event that the water to be diverted pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section is not within a water district, but an irrigation delivery entity diverts water from the same natural watercourse, the required notices shall be given to said irrigation delivery entity. For uses authorized in subsection (3)(a) of this section, notice shall not be required but may be provided when it is reasonable to do so.
(6) A water right holder who determines that a use set forth in subsection (3) of this section is causing a water right to which the holder is entitled to be deprived of water to which it may be otherwise entitled may petition the director of the department of water resources to order cessation of or modification of the use to prevent injury to a water right. Upon such a petition, the director shall cause an investigation to be made and may hold hearings or gather information in some other manner. In the event that the director finds that an injury is occurring to a water right, he may require the use to cease or be modified to ensure that no injury to other water rights occurs. A water right holder feeling aggrieved by a decision or action of the director shall be entitled to contest the action of the director pursuant to section 42-1701A(3), Idaho Code.

(7) This title delegates to the department of water resources exclusive authority over the appropriation of the public surface and ground waters of the state. No other agency, department, county, city, municipal corporation or other instrumentality or political subdivision of the state shall enact any rule or ordinance or take any other action to prohibit, restrict or regulate the appropriation of the public surface or ground waters of the state, and any such action shall be null and void.

(8) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, a municipality or municipal provider as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho Code, a sewer district as defined in section 42-3202, Idaho Code, or a regional public entity operating a publicly owned treatment works shall not be required to obtain a water right for the collection, treatment, storage or disposal of effluent from a publicly owned treatment works or other system for the collection of sewage or stormwater where such collection, treatment, storage or disposal, including land application, is employed in response to state or federal regulatory requirements. If land application is to take place on lands not identified as a place of use for an existing irrigation water right, the municipal provider or sewer district shall provide the department of water resources with notice describing the location of the land application, or any change therein, prior to land application taking place. The notice shall be upon forms furnished by the department of water resources and shall provide all required information.

(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, a person or entity operating a canal or conduit for irrigation or other beneficial uses authorized by a water right that permits water to be diverted from a natural watercourse for such purposes shall not be required to obtain an additional water right for the incidental use of that same water where the water is diverted for irrigation or other beneficial use and thereafter used to generate hydroelectricity in the canal or conduit, if (a) the use for hydroelectric purposes does not increase the rate of diversion of water from the natural watercourse, and (b) the person or entity has the right to generate electricity under a license or exemption issued under the federal power act, a lease of power privileges or other authorization, agreement or contract with reclamation or other federal, state or local governmental agency. The incidental hydropower use shall be junior to and fully subordinated to all existing and future uses and shall be nonconsumptive. To qualify for this exemption, the person or entity must give written notice to the department of water resources and the watermaster describing the hydropower use, location and capacity of the project upon completion of the project. The notice must include a copy of the order or document authorizing the project. The notice must also certify that the incidental use of water for hydropower purposes under the existing water right meets all the requirements of this subsection.

§ 42-202. Application to appropriate water — Contents — Filing fees — Disposition of fees — Record of receipts.

For the purpose of regulating the use of the public waters and of establishing by direct means the priority right to such use, any person, association or corporation hereafter intending to acquire the right to the beneficial use of the waters of any natural streams, springs or seepage waters, lakes or ground water, or other public waters in the state of Idaho, shall, before commencing of the construction, enlargement or extension of the ditch, canal, well, or other distributing works, or performing any work in connection with said construction or proposed appropriation or the diversion of any waters into a natural channel, make an application to the department of water resources for a permit to make such appropriation. Provided however, if the use of the diversion works or irrigation system is represented by shares of stock in a corporation or if such works or system is owned or managed by an irrigation district, no such application may be approved by the director of the department of water resources without the consent of such corporation or irrigation district. Such application must set forth:

The name and post-office address of the applicant.

The source of the water supply.

The nature of the proposed use or uses and the period of the year during which water is to be used for such use or uses.

The location of the point of diversion and description of the proposed ditch, channel, well or other work and the amount of water to be diverted and used.

The time required for the completion of construction of such works and application of the water to the proposed use.

An application proposing an appropriation of water by a municipal provider for reasonably anticipated future needs shall be accompanied by sufficient information and documentation to establish that the applicant qualifies as a municipal provider and that the reasonably anticipated future needs, the service area and the planning horizon are consistent with the definitions and requirements specified in this chapter. The service area need not be described by legal description nor by description of every intended use in detail, but the area must be described with sufficient information to identify the general location where the water under the water right is to be used and the types and quantity of uses that generally will be made.

Whenever it is desired to appropriate and store flood or winterflow waters, the applicant shall specify in acre feet the quantity of such flood or winterflow waters which he intends to store, but for irrigation purposes he shall not claim more than five (5) acre feet of stored water per acre of land to be irrigated, nor, in the event of the filing of an application claiming both normal flow and flood water and winterflow water, shall the total amount of water claimed exceed the equivalent of a continuous flow during the irrigation season of more than one (1) cubic foot per second for each fifty (50) acres of land to be irrigated, or more than five (5) acre feet of stored water for each acre of land to be irrigated.
(4) The application shall be accompanied by a plan and map of the proposed works for the diversion and application of the water to a beneficial use, showing the character, location and dimensions of the proposed reservoirs, dams, canals, ditches, pipelines, wells and all other works proposed to be used by them in the diversion of the water, and the area and location of the lands proposed to be irrigated, or location of place of other use.

(5) If the application involves more than twenty-five (25) cubic feet per second of water or the development of more than five hundred (500) theoretical horsepower, or impoundment of water in a reservoir with an active storage capacity in excess of ten thousand (10,000) acre feet, the applicant may be required by the director of the department of water resources to furnish a statement of the financial resources of the corporation, association, firm or person making the application, and the means by which the funds necessary to construct the proposed works are to be provided, and the estimated cost of construction; and if such application is made by a corporation, the amount of its capital stock, how much thereof has been actually paid in, and the names and places of residence of its directors; and if for the generation of power or any other purpose than irrigation or domestic use, the purpose for which it is proposed to be used, the nature, location, character, capacity and estimated cost of the works, and whether the water used is to be and will be returned to the stream, and if so, at what point on the stream.

(6) In case the proposed right of use is for agricultural purposes, the application shall give the legal subdivisions of the land proposed to be irrigated, with the total acreage to be reclaimed as near as may be; provided, that no one shall be authorized to divert for irrigation purposes more than one (1) cubic foot of water per second of the normal flow for each fifty (50) acres of land to be so irrigated, or more than five (5) acre feet of stored water per annum for each acre of land to be so irrigated, unless it can be shown to the satisfaction of the department of water resources that a greater amount is necessary. Provided further, that the plan of irrigation submitted shall provide for the distribution of water to within not more than one (1) mile of each legal subdivision of the land proposed to be reclaimed by the use of such water; provided also, that in the case of all ditches designed to have a capacity of ten (10) cubic feet per second or less, such map showing the location of such ditch, and the place of use of such water, or the location of the lands to be irrigated, may be upon blanks furnished by the department of water resources.

(7) No application shall be accepted and filed by the department of water resources until the applicant shall have deposited with the department a filing fee as in this chapter provided.

(8) All moneys received by the department of water resources under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited with the state treasurer, and such sums as may be necessary shall be available for the payment of the expenses of the department of water resources incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(9) Such expense shall be paid by the state controller in the manner provided by law, upon vouchers duly approved by the state board of examiners, for the work performed under the direction of the department of water resources. The department of water resources shall keep a record of all filing fees received in connection with applications for permits to appropriate public waters.

(10) Provided further, that rights initiated prior to the enactment of this amendment, so far as it pertains to flood and winterflow waters, shall not be affected thereby.

(11) Provided further, that water rights held by municipal providers prior to July 1, 1996, shall not be limited thereby.

Parties to Suits.

The United States was an indispensable party to a suit by an irrigation district where the United States had a contractual interest for use of the waters involved. American Falls Reservoir Dist. No. 2 v. Crandall, 82 F.2d 973, modified, 85 F.2d 865 (9th Cir. 1936).

§ 42-202A. Temporary approval — Application — Criteria — Exceptions.

Any person, association or corporation hereafter intending to use the waters of any natural streams, springs or seepage waters, lakes or ground water, or other public waters in the state of Idaho, for a minor use of short duration may make application to the department of water resources for temporary approval.

Application for temporary approval shall be upon forms provided by the department of water resources and shall be accompanied by a fifty dollar ($50.00) fee.

The director of the department of water resources is not required to publish notice of the application pursuant to the provisions of section 42-203A, Idaho Code, and is not required to make findings as provided in section 42-203A or 42-203C, Idaho Code. The director may, however, give notice of an application as he determines appropriate and may grant a temporary approval upon completion of the application form, payment of the filing fee, a determination by the director that the temporary approval can be properly administered, a determination that other sources of water are not available, a determination that approval is in the public interest and a determination that the temporary approval will not injure public values associated with the water source or any other water right. If the temporary approval is within a water district, the director shall seek and consider the recommendations of the watermaster before granting a temporary approval. The director may issue a temporary approval with the conditions determined by the director to be necessary to protect other water rights and the public interest.

The recipient of any temporary approval issued pursuant to the provisions of this act shall assume all risk that the diversion and use of the water may injure other water rights, or otherwise not comply with the criteria described in section 42-203A(5), Idaho Code. Any applicant for a temporary approval who is aggrieved by a denial of the director of a temporary approval pursuant to this act may file an application to appropriate water as provided in section 42-202, Idaho Code.

A temporary approval shall only be granted for a use not intended to become an established water right:

For prevention of flood damage;

For ground water recharge;

For ground or surface water remediation; or

For any other use which will not exceed a total diverted volume of five (5) acre feet for the duration of the approval.

Approval of the uses set forth herein shall not exceed one (1) year. “Remediation” is defined to be the removal of hazardous substances or petroleum, as those terms are defined in section 39-7203, Idaho Code, from water in response to state or federal health and safety requirements. Approvals issued under the provisions of this section constitute a waiver of the mandatory permit requirements of section 42-201(2), Idaho Code, and do not create a continuing right to use water. Temporary approvals shall not be issued as an interim water supply for a use which requires a continuing water supply.

§ 42-202B. Definitions.

Whenever used in this title, the term:

“Consumptive use” means that portion of the annual volume of water diverted under a water right that is transpired by growing vegetation, evaporated from soils, converted to nonrecoverable water vapor, incorporated into products, or otherwise does not return to the waters of the state. Consumptive use is not an element of a water right. Consumptive use does not include any water that falls as precipitation directly on the place of use. Precipitation shall not be considered to reduce the consumptive use of a water right. “Authorized consumptive use” means the maximum consumptive use that may be made of a water right. If the use of a water right is for irrigation, for example, the authorized consumptive use reflects irrigation of the most consumptive vegetation that may be grown at the place of use. Changes in consumptive use do not require a transfer pursuant to section 42-222, Idaho Code.

“Digital boundary” means the boundary encompassing and defining an area consisting of or incorporating the place of use or permissible place of use for a water right prepared and maintained by the department of water resources using a geographic information system in conformance with the national standard for spatial data accuracy or succeeding standard.

“Local public interest” is defined as the interests that the people in the area directly affected by a proposed water use have in the effects of such use on the public water resource.

“Municipality” means a city incorporated under section 50-102, Idaho Code, a county, or the state of Idaho acting through a department or institution.

“Municipal provider” means:

A municipality that provides water for municipal purposes to its residents and other users within its service area;

Any corporation or association holding a franchise to supply water for municipal purposes, or a political subdivision of the state of Idaho authorized to supply water for municipal purposes, and which does supply water, for municipal purposes to users within its service area; or

A corporation or association which supplies water for municipal purposes through a water system regulated by the state of Idaho as a “public water supply” as described in section 39-103(12), Idaho Code.

“Municipal purposes” refers to water for residential, commercial, industrial, irrigation of parks and open space, and related purposes, excluding use of water from geothermal sources for heating, which a municipal provider is entitled or obligated to supply to all those users within a service area, including those located outside the boundaries of a municipality served by a municipal provider.

“Planning horizon” refers to the length of time that the department determines is reasonable for a municipal provider to hold water rights to meet reasonably anticipated future needs. The length of the planning horizon may vary according to the needs of the particular municipal provider.

“Reasonably anticipated future needs” refers to future uses of water by a municipal provider for municipal purposes within a service area which, on the basis of population and other planning data, are reasonably expected to be required within the planning horizon of each municipality within the service area not inconsistent with comprehensive land use plans approved by each municipality. Reasonably anticipated future needs shall not include uses of water within areas overlapped by conflicting comprehensive land use plans.
(9) “Service area” means that area within which a municipal provider is or becomes entitled or obligated to provide water for municipal purposes. For a municipality, the service area shall correspond to its corporate limits, or other recognized boundaries, including changes therein after the permit or license is issued. The service area for a municipality may also include areas outside its corporate limits, or other recognized boundaries, that are within the municipality’s established planning area if the constructed delivery system for the area shares a common water distribution system with lands located within the corporate limits. For a municipal provider that is not a municipality, the service area shall correspond to the area that it is authorized or obligated to serve, including changes therein after the permit or license is issued.

§ 42-203. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 42-203A. Notice upon receipt of application — Protest — Hearing and findings — Appeals.

Upon receipt of an application to appropriate the waters of this state, the department of water resources shall prepare a notice in such form as the department may prescribe, specifying: (a) the number of the application; (b) the date of filing thereof; (c) the name and post-office address of the applicant; (d) the source of the water supply; (e) the amount of water to be appropriated; (f) in general the nature of the proposed use; (g) the approximate location of the point of diversion; and (h) the point of use. The department shall also state in said notice that any protest against the approval of such application, in form prescribed by the department, shall be filed with the department within ten (10) days from the last date of publication of such notice.

The director of the department of water resources shall cause the notice to be published in a newspaper printed within the county wherein the point of diversion lies or, in the event no newspaper is printed in said county, then in a newspaper of general circulation therein. When the application proposes a diversion in excess of ten (10) c.f.s. or one thousand (1,000) acre feet, the director shall cause the notice to be published in a newspaper or newspapers sufficient to achieve statewide circulation. Any notice shall be published at least once each week for two (2) successive weeks.

The director of the department shall also cause notice of the application to be accessible from the department’s internet homepage beginning on or before the date the application is first published in the newspaper as described in subsection (2) of this section, and ending no sooner than the deadline for protesting the application, consistent with subsection (1) of this section. Notice accessible from the internet homepage may be represented by an abstract, summary, or other such representation that includes all the information required by subsection (1) of this section for notice of an application. The notice published in the newspaper pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be the official notice. Errors or omissions in the notices accessible from the internet homepage shall not invalidate the published notice.

Any person, firm, association or corporation concerned in any such application may, within the time allowed in the notice of application, file with said director of the department of water resources a written protest, together with the statutory filing fee as provided in section 42-221, Idaho Code, against the approval of such application, which protest shall state the name and address of protestant and shall be signed by him or by his agent or attorney and shall clearly set forth his objections to the approval of such application. Hearing upon the protest so filed shall be held within sixty (60) days from the date such protest is received. Notice of this hearing shall be given by mailing notice not less than ten (10) days before the date of hearing and shall be forwarded to both the applicant and the protestant, or protestants, by certified mail. Such notice shall state the names of the applicant and protestant, or protestants, the time and place fixed for the hearing and such other information as the director of the department of water resources may deem advisable. In the event that no protest is filed, then the director of the department of water resources may forthwith approve the application, providing the same in all respects conforms with the requirements of this chapter, and with the regulations of the department of water resources.

Such hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of section 42-1701A(1) and (2), Idaho Code. The director of the department of water resources shall find and determine from the evidence presented to what use or uses the water sought to be appropriated can be and are intended to be applied. In all applications whether protested or not protested, where the proposed use is such: (a) that it will reduce the quantity of water under existing water rights, or (b) that the water supply itself is insufficient for the purpose for which it is sought to be appropriated, or (c) where it appears to the satisfaction of the director that such application is not made in good faith, is made for delay or speculative purposes, or (d) that the applicant has not sufficient financial resources with which to complete the work involved therein, or (e) that it will conflict with the local public interest as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho Code, or (f) that it is contrary to conservation of water resources within the state of Idaho, or (g) that it will adversely affect the local economy of the watershed or local area within which the source of water for the proposed use originates, in the case where the place of use is outside of the watershed or local area where the source of water originates; the director of the department of water resources may reject such application and refuse issuance of a permit therefor, or may partially approve and grant a permit for a smaller quantity of water than applied for, or may grant a permit upon conditions. Provided however, that minimum stream flow water rights may not be established under the local public interest criterion, and may only be established pursuant to chapter 15, title 42, Idaho Code. The provisions of this section shall apply to any boundary stream between this and any other state in all cases where the water sought to be appropriated has its source largely within the state, irrespective of the location of any proposed power generating plant.

Any person or corporation who has formally appeared at the hearing, aggrieved by the judgment of the director of the department of water resources, may seek judicial review thereof in accordance with section 42-1701A(4), Idaho Code.

§ 42-203B. Authority to subordinate rights — Nature of subordinated water right and authority to establish a subordination condition — Authority to limit term of permit or license.

The legislature finds and declares that it is in the public interest to specifically implement the state’s power to regulate and limit the use of water for power purposes and to define the relationship between the state and the holder of a water right for power purposes to the extent such right exceeds an established minimum flow. The purposes of the trust established by subsections (2) and (3) of this section are to assure an adequate supply of water for all future beneficial uses and to clarify and protect the right of a user of water for power purposes subordinated by a permit issued after July 1, 1985, or by an agreement, to continue using the water pending approval of depletionary future beneficial uses.

A water right for power purposes which is defined by agreement with the state as unsubordinated to the extent of a minimum flow established by state action shall remain unsubordinated as defined by the agreement. Any portion of the water rights for power purposes in excess of the level so established shall be held in trust by the state of Idaho, by and through the governor, for the use and benefit of the user of the water for power purposes, and of the people of the state of Idaho; provided, however, that application of the provisions of this section to water rights for hydropower purposes on the Snake river or its tributaries downstream from Milner dam shall not place in trust any water from the Snake river or surface or ground water tributary to the Snake river upstream from Milner dam. For the purposes of the determination and administration of rights to the use of the waters of the Snake river or its tributaries downstream from Milner dam, no portion of the waters of the Snake river or surface or ground water tributary to the Snake river upstream from Milner dam shall be considered. The rights held in trust shall be subject to subordination to and depletion by future upstream beneficial users whose rights are acquired pursuant to state law, including compliance with the requirements of section 42-203C, Idaho Code.

Water rights for power purposes not defined by agreement with the state shall not be subject to depletion below any applicable minimum stream flow established by state action. Water rights for power purposes in excess of such minimum stream flow shall be held in trust by the state of Idaho, by and through the governor, for the use and benefit of the users of water for power purposes and of the people of the state of Idaho. The rights held in trust shall be subject to subordination to and depletion by future consumptive upstream beneficial users whose rights are acquired pursuant to state law, excluding compliance with the requirements of section 42-203C, Idaho Code.

The user of water for power purposes as beneficiary of the trust established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be entitled to use water available at its facilities to the extent of the water right, and to protect its rights to the use of the water as provided by state law against depletions or claims not in accordance with state law.

The governor or his designee is hereby authorized and empowered to enter into agreements with holders of water rights for power purposes to define that portion of their water rights at or below the level of the applicable minimum stream flow as being unsubordinated to upstream beneficial uses and depletions, and to define such rights in excess thereof as being held in trust by the state under subsection (2) of this section. Such agreements shall be subject to ratification by law. The contract entered into by the governor and the Idaho power company on October 25, 1984, is hereby found and declared to be such an agreement, and the legislature hereby ratifies the governor’s authority and power to enter into this agreement.
(6) The director shall have the authority to subordinate the rights granted in a permit or license for power purposes to subsequent upstream beneficial depletionary uses. A subordinated water right for power use does not give rise to any claim against, or right to interfere with, the holder of subsequent upstream rights established pursuant to state law. The director shall also have the authority to limit a permit or license for power purposes to a term, which may be in the form of a fixed date or by reference to a federal energy regulatory commission (FERC) license or other authorization issued or contract executed, in connection with the power project.

The term of any power purchase contract which is, or reasonably may become, applicable to, such permit or license;

The policy of the Idaho public utilities commission (IPUC) regarding the term of power purchase contracts as administered by the IPUC under and pursuant to the authority of the public utility regulatory policy act of 1978 (PURPA);

The term of any FERC license granted, or which reasonably may be granted, with respect to any particular permit or license for power purpose;

Existing downstream water uses established pursuant to state law.

Subsection (6) of this section shall not apply to licenses which have already been issued as of July 1, 1985.

(7) The director, in the exercise of the authority to limit a permit or license for power purposes to a term, shall, for purposes of determining such term, consider any of the following factors, among others:

The term shall be determined at the time of issuance of the permit, or as soon thereafter as practicable if adequate information is not then available. The term shall commence upon application of water to beneficial use. The term, once established, shall not thereafter be modified except in accordance with due process of law prior to expiring.

(8) If a term is established by the director by reference to the hydropower project’s FERC license, the term shall automatically extend to run concurrently with any annual renewals of the project’s FERC license. Prior to the issuance of a subsequent or new FERC license for the project, the director may review the water right license and may issue an order canceling all or any part of the use, establishing a new term, or revising, adding or deleting conditions under which the water right may be exercised. The order shall take effect on the date the current term, as may be extended through annual renewals, expires. If the director does not issue such an order, the term shall automatically extend to a length equal to the project’s subsequent or new FERC license and any original conditions on the water right license shall remain in effect.

§ 42-203C. Hydropower water right — Criteria for reallocation — Weight — Burden of proof.

If an applicant intends to appropriate water which is held in trust by the state of Idaho pursuant to subsection (5) of section 42-203B, Idaho Code, the director shall consider, prior to approving the application, the criteria established in section 42-203A, Idaho Code, and whether the proposed use, individually or cumulatively with other existing uses, or uses reasonably likely to exist within twelve (12) months of the proposed use, would significantly reduce the amount of trust water available to the holder of the water right used for power production that is defined by agreement pursuant to subsection (5) of section 42-203B, Idaho Code, and, if so, whether the proposed reduction is in the public interest.

The director in making such public interest determinations for purposes of this section shall consider:
(2)(a) The director in making such public interest determinations for purposes of this section shall consider:

The potential benefits, both direct and indirect, that the proposed use would provide to the state and local economy;

The economic impact the proposed use would have upon electric utility rates in the state of Idaho, and the availability, foreseeability and cost of alternative energy sources to ameliorate such impact;

The promotion of the family farming tradition;

The promotion of full economic and multiple use development of the water resources of the state of Idaho;

In the Snake River Basin above the Murphy gauge whether the proposed development conforms to a staged development policy of up to twenty thousand (20,000) acres per year or eighty thousand (80,000) acres in any four (4) year period.

The burden of proof under the provisions of this section shall be on the protestant.

No single factor enumerated above shall be entitled to greater weight by the director in arriving at this determination.

§ 42-203D. Review of permits — Opportunity for hearing.

The director of the department of water resources shall review all permits issued prior to July 1, 1985, which propose to divert water held in trust by the state of Idaho pursuant to subsection (5) of section 42-203B, Idaho Code, except to the extent a permit has been put to beneficial use prior to July 1, 1985, to determine whether they comply with the provisions of section 42-203C, Idaho Code. If the department finds that the proposed use is allowed under section 42-203C, Idaho Code, then the department shall enter an order continuing the permit. If the department finds that the proposed use is not allowed under section 42-203C, Idaho Code, then the department shall either cancel the permit or impose the conditions required to bring the permit into compliance with section 42-203C, Idaho Code.

The department shall provide an opportunity for hearing in accordance with section 42-1701A, Idaho Code, and chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, for each holder of a permit that is proposed either to be cancelled or made subject to new conditions.